test/src/morphology/A-tjahppat_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Adjektiv - tjáhppat: # -a-stammar
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Nom: tjáhppat
    tjáhppat+A+Attr: tjähppis
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Gen: tjáhppada
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Acc: tjáhppadav
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ill: tjáhppadij
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ine: tjáhppadin
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Ela: tjáhppadist
    tjáhppat+A+Sg+Com: tjáhppadijn
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Nom: tjáhppada
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Gen: tjáhppadij
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Acc: tjáhppadijt
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ill: tjáhppadijda
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ine: tjáhppadijn
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Ela: tjáhppadijst
    tjáhppat+A+Pl+Com: tjáhppadij
    tjáhppat+A+Ess: tjáhppadin
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjáhppadup
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Attr: tjáhppadup
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: tjáhppadubbo
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: tjáhppadubbov
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: tjáhppadubbuj
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: tjáhppadubbon
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: tjáhppadubbost
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [tjáhppadubbujn, tjáhppadubbujna]
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: tjáhppadubbo
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: tjáhppadubboj
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: tjáhppadubbojt
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: tjáhppadubbojda
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: tjáhppadubbojn
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: tjáhppadubbojst
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Pl+Com: tjáhppadubboj
    tjáhppat+A+Comp+Ess: tjáhppadubbon
